South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3154.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 24-21-490(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The Department of Probation, Parole and Pardon Services shall collect and distribute restitution on a monthly basis from all offenders under probationary and intensive probationary supervision. The department shall consider an offender's ability to make restitution when it determines the amount of an offender's monthly payment. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----